src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_ID_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - kúnid - ENGLISH : # CLASS_ID_STEM_1

     kúnid+V+Sg+Impv: kúnid
     kúnid+V+Interr+Simp+Pres: kúnid
     kúnid+V+Interr+Past: kúnidaa
     kúnid+V+Indir+Past: kúnidaan
     kúnid+V+Rel: kúnids
     kúnid+V+Rel+Evid: kúnidaas
     kúnid+V+Past+NonFact: kúnidaa.ang
     kúnid+V+Interr+Fut+Long: kúnidäsaa
     kúnid+V+Interr+Fut+Short: kúnidäs
     kúnid+V+Simp+Fut: kúnidäsaang
     kúnid+V+Imm+Fut: kúnidäsga
     kúnid+V+Rel+Fut: kúnidäsaas
     kúnid+V+Fut+NonFact: kúnidäsaa.ang
     kúnid+V+Bias+Imm+Pres: kúnidʼuuj
     kúnid+V+Bias+Simp+Pres: kúnidʼuujang
     kúnid+V+Res: kúnidäsaaʼuujang
     kúnid+V+Bias+Interr+Pres: kúnidʼus
     kúnid+V+Bias+Interr+Past: kúnidʼujaa
     kúnid+V+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: kúnidʼuujaangaa
     kúnid+V+Bias+Interr+Fut: kúnidäsaaʼus
     kúnid+V+Cert+Fut: kúnidäsaaʼahlans
     kúnid+V+Fut+Rflx+Interr: kúnidäseehl
     kúnid+V+Pl+Impv: kúnidʼuu
     kúnid+V+3pl+Imm+Pres: kúnidʼwaa
     kúnid+V+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: kúnidʼwaa
     kúnid+V+3pl+Simp+Pres: kúnidʼwaang
     kúnid+V+3pl+Dir+Past: kúnidʼwägan
     kúnid+V+3pl+Interr+Past: kúnidʼaawaa
     kúnid+V+3pl+Indir+Past: kúnidʼaawaan
     kúnid+V+3pl+Rel: kúnidʼwaas
     kúnid+V+3pl+Rel+Evid: kúnidʼaawaas
     kúnid+V+3pl+NonFact: kúnidʼwaa.ang
     kúnid+V+3pl+Past+NonFact: kúnidʼaawaa.ang
     kúnid+V+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: kúnidʼwägiinii
     kúnid+V+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: kúnidʼwägaangaa
     kúnid+V+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: kúnidʼwägaangaan
     kúnid+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: kúnidʼwaaäsaa
     kúnid+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: kúnidʼwaaäs
     kúnid+V+3pl+Simp+Fut: kúnidʼwaaäsaang
     kúnid+V+3pl+Imm+Fut: kúnidʼwaaäsga
     kúnid+V+3pl+Rel+Fut: kúnidʼwaaäsaas
     kúnid+V+3pl+Fut+NonFact: kúnidʼwaaäsaa.ang
     kúnid+V+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: kúnidʼwaa.ang k̲asaʼáa
     kúnid+V+3pl+Near+Fut: kúnidʼwaa.ang k̲asaʼáang
     kúnid+V+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: kúnidʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     kúnid+V+3pl+VNear+Fut: kúnidʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     kúnid+V+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: kúnidʼwaaʼuuj
     kúnid+V+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: kúnidʼwaaʼuujang
     kúnid+V+3pl+Res: kúnidʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     kúnid+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: kúnidʼwaaʼus
     kúnid+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: kúnidʼwaaʼujaa
     kúnid+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: kúnidʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     kúnid+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: kúnidʼwaaäsaaʼus
     kúnid+V+3pl+Cert+Pres: kúnidʼwaaʼahlanggang
     kúnid+V+3pl+Cert+Past: kúnidʼwaaʼahlanggan
     kúnid+V+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: kúnidʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     kúnid+V+3pl+Cert+Fut: kúnidʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     kúnid+V+3pl+Cert+Rel: kúnidʼwaaʼahlans
     kúnid+V+3pl+Ints+Past: kúnidʼaawaaʼahlang
     kúnid+V+3pl+Cont: kúnidʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     kúnid+V+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: kúnidʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     kúnid+V+3pl+Rflx: kúnidʼwaaʼahl
     kúnid+V+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: kúnidʼwaaäseehl
     kúnid+V+Neg+Sg+Impv: kúnidʼang
     kúnid+V+Neg+Imm+Pres: kúnidʼangga
     kúnid+V+Neg+Interr+Simp+Pres: kúnidʼang
     kúnid+V+Neg+Simp+Pres: kúnidʼanggang
     kúnid+V+Neg+Dir+Past: kúnidʼanggan
     kúnid+V+Neg+Interr+Past: kúnidʼaangaa
     kúnid+V+Neg+Indir+Past: kúnidʼaangaan
     kúnid+V+Neg+Rel: kúnidʼans
     kúnid+V+Neg+Rel+Evid: kúnidʼaangaas
     kúnid+V+Neg+NonFact: kúnidʼangang
     kúnid+V+Neg+Past+NonFact: kúnidʼaangaa.ang
     kúnid+V+Neg+Interr+Pres+Hab: kúnidʼanggang
     kúnid+V+Neg+Dir+Past+Hab: kúnidʼanggiinii
     kúnid+V+Neg+Interr+Past+Hab: kúnidʼanggaangaa
     kúnid+V+Neg+Indir+Past+Hab: kúnidʼanggaangaan
     kúnid+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Long: kúnidʼangäsaa
     kúnid+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Short: kúnidʼangäs
     kúnid+V+Neg+Simp+Fut: kúnidʼangäsaang
     kúnid+V+Neg+Imm+Fut: kúnidʼangäsga
     kúnid+V+Neg+Rel+Fut: kúnidʼangäsaas
     kúnid+V+Neg+Fut+NonFact: kúnidʼangäsaa.ang
     kúnid+V+Neg+Bias+Imm+Pres: kúnidʼangʼuuj
     kúnid+V+Neg+Bias+Simp+Pres: kúnidʼangʼuujang
     kúnid+V+Neg+Res: kúnidʼangäsaaʼuujang
     kúnid+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Pres: kúnidʼangʼus
     kúnid+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past: kúnidʼangʼujaa
     kúnid+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: kúnidʼangʼuujaangaa
     kúnid+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Fut: kúnidʼangäsaaʼus
     kúnid+V+Neg+Cert+Pres: kúnidʼaangʼahlanggang
     kúnid+V+Neg+Cert+Past: kúnidʼaangʼahlanggan
     kúnid+V+Neg+Cert+Past+Hab: kúnidʼaangʼahlanggiinii
     kúnid+V+Neg+Cert+Fut: kúnidʼangäsaaʼahlans
     kúnid+V+Neg+Cert+Rel: kúnidʼaangʼahlans
     kúnid+V+Neg+Ints+Past: kúnidʼaangaaʼahlang
     kúnid+V+Neg+Cont: kúnidʼaangaaʼahlanggaa
     kúnid+V+Neg+Ctfact+Pres: kúnidʼaangaaʼahlanggang
     kúnid+V+Neg+Rflx: kúnidʼaangʼahl
     kúnid+V+Neg+Fut+Rflx+Interr: kúnidʼangäseehl
     kúnid+V+Neg+Pl+Impv: kúnidʼangʼuu
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Pres: kúnidʼangʼwaa
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: kúnidʼangʼwaa
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Pres: kúnidʼangʼwaang
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past: kúnidʼangʼwägan
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past: kúnidʼangʼaawaa
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past: kúnidʼangʼaawaan
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Rel: kúnidʼangʼwaas
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Evid: kúnidʼangʼaawaas
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+NonFact: kúnidʼangʼwaa.ang
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Past+NonFact: kúnidʼangʼaawaa.ang
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: kúnidʼangʼwägiinii
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: kúnidʼangʼwägaangaa
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: kúnidʼangʼwägaangaan
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: kúnidʼangʼwaaäsaa
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: kúnidʼangʼwaaäs
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Fut: kúnidʼangʼwaaäsaang
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Fut: kúnidʼangʼwaaäsga
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Fut: kúnidʼangʼwaaäsaas
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+NonFact: kúnidʼangʼwaaäsaa.ang
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: kúnidʼwaa.ang k̲asaaʼáng
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Near+Fut: kúnidʼwaa.ang k̲asaaʼánggang
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: kúnidʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdläʼáng
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+VNear+Fut: kúnidʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdläʼánggang
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: kúnidʼangʼwaaʼuuj
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: kúnidʼangʼwaaʼuujang
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Res: kúnidʼangʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: kúnidʼangʼwaaʼus
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: kúnidʼangʼwaaʼujaa
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: kúnidʼangʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: kúnidʼangʼwaaäsaaʼus
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Pres: kúnidʼangʼwaaʼahlanggang
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past: kúnidʼangʼwaaʼahlanggan
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: kúnidʼangʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Fut: kúnidʼangʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Rel: kúnidʼangʼwaaʼahlans
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Ints+Past: kúnidʼangʼaawaaʼahlang
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Cont: kúnidʼangʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: kúnidʼangʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Rflx: kúnidʼangʼwaaʼahl
     kúnid+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: kúnidʼangʼwaaäseehl
